California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(a) Any person, firm, or corporation, their lessees, trustees, receivers or trustees appointed by any court, who sells or delivers water exclusively to a water conservation district organized under the laws of the state or who leases or otherwise permits the use of ditches or other water transmission facilities exclusively by the district is not a public utility within the meaning of this chapter. No portion of the works, property, or water rights of any of those parties shall be deemed dedicated to a public use by reason of selling or
 delivering water to a water conservation district.

(b) Any person, firm, or corporation with water that is not being used to supply water to a public water system, or that is not otherwise dedicated to public use, that sells, leases, transfers, or otherwise delivers the water at wholesale to any public agency or to a water corporation providing water utility service, is not a public utility within the meaning of this chapter.

(c) This section does not apply to mutual water companies.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 420, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

2707.

For the purpose of determining the status of any person, firm, or corporation, their lessees, trustees, receivers or trustees appointed by any court, owning, controlling, operating, or managing any water system or water supply within this state, the commission may hold hearings and issue process and orders in the manner and to the same extent as provided in Part 1 (commencing with Section 201), and the findings and conclusions of the commission on questions of fact arising under this chapter are final and not subject to review, except as provided in Part 1 (commencing with Section 201).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 142, Sec. 132.)
-------------------------------------------

2708.

Whenever the commission, after a hearing had upon its own motion or upon complaint, finds that any water company which is a public utility operating within this State has reached the limit of its capacity to supply water and that no further consumers of water can be supplied from the system of such utility without injuriously withdrawing the supply wholly or in part from those who have theretofore been supplied by the corporation, the commission may order and require that no such corporation shall furnish water to any new or additional consumers until the order is vacated or modified by the commission. The commission, after hearing upon its own motion or upon complaint, may
 also require any such water company to allow additional consumers to be served when it appears that service to additional consumers will not injuriously withdraw the supply wholly or in part from those who theretofore had been supplied by such public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2709.

The commission may require any water corporation to file with the commission a statement in writing defining and describing the lands and territory to be supplied by the corporation with water.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2710.

When it appears from (a) the statement required by Section 2709, (b) the articles of incorporation of any water corporation, or (c) any notice of appropriation of water required by law, that a water corporation has undertaken to supply more consumers or a greater number of acres than it can adequately supply, the commission may require the corporation to limit the number of consumers or acres of land which it has undertaken to supply or which is set out in its articles of incorporation or notices of appropriation to such a limited number of consumers or acres of land as the commission finds, after hearing,
 that the water corporation may adequately supply.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2711.

Section 2710 does not apply to territory or consumers which have once been served by the corporation. As between consumers who have been voluntarily admitted to participate by the corporation in its supply of water or required to be supplied by an order of the commission, in times of water shortage the corporation shall give no priority or preference but shall apportion its supply ratably among its consumers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2712.

“Whether under contract or otherwise” as used in Section 2701 is not to be construed as authorizing a contract by a person or corporation defined in this chapter as a public utility which in anywise deprives the State or the commission or other competent authority of power to regulate the rates and service of any such public utility.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 764.)
-------------------------------------------

2713.

(a) No water corporation subject to the jurisdiction and control of the commission and the provisions of Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) of this division shall make any charge upon any entity providing fire protection service to others for furnishing water for such fire protection purposes or for any costs of operation, installation, capital, maintenance, repair, alteration, or replacement of facilities related to furnishing water for such fire protection purposes within the service area of such water corporation, except pursuant to a written agreement with such entity providing fire protection services. A water corporation shall furnish water for
 fire protection purposes to the extent of its means and as a condition of a certificate of public convenience and necessity, in case of fire or other great necessity, within the boundaries of the territory served by it for use within such territory.

(b) The provisions of subdivision (a) shall not restrict or limit a water corporation furnishing water for fire protection purposes from levying charges for water service or facilities, including water for fire protection purposes, on any person, property, or entity, whether public or private, other than on an entity providing fire protection service.

Such charges shall be collected from such other persons, property, or entities pursuant to existing provisions of law which authorize such charges, or from an entity providing fire protection services only pursuant to a written agreement authorizing such charges.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “entity providing fire protection service” means a city, county, city and county, whether general law or chartered, and a fire company, fire protection district, or any other person, association, company, corporation, special district, municipal corporation, or any other public or private entity, which public or private entity or person provides fire protection services to any other public or private entity or person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 862.)
-------------------------------------------

2714.

No water corporation furnishing water for residential use to a tenant shall seek to recover any charges or penalties for the furnishing of water to or for the tenant’s residential use from any subsequent tenant on account of nonpayment of charges by a previous tenant. The water corporation may, however, require that service to subsequent tenants be furnished on the account of the landlord or property owner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1251, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

2715.

(a) A water corporation with more than 10,000 service connections shall maintain on its Internet Web site an archive of all pending, approved, or rejected advice letters for a period of two rate case cycles from the date the advice letter is submitted or for six years, whichever is shorter, and shall do all of the following:

(1) Provide a direct link from its Internet Web site to each advice letter, making the information contained there available to the public. 

(2) Maintain advice letters in numerical order. The advice letters may be retained as a stand-alone site. The water corporation may combine the
 list with a list of current advice letters that have been transmitted for filing, or are filed, pending, protested, or otherwise active.

(3) Include a link to the commission’s index of advice letters on the
 water corporation’s Internet Web site.

(b) For the purposes of this section, “advice letter” means an advice letter pending, approved, or rejected on or after January 1, 2019, and includes its concurrently submitted cover sheets, attachments, service lists, and exhibits, to the extent they are not identified as confidential.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 409, Sec. 1.   (SB 959)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.5. Public Water System Investment and Consolidation Act of 1997 [2718. - 2720.]

2718.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Public Water System Investment and Consolidation Act of 1997.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2719.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Public water systems are faced with the need to replace or upgrade the public water system infrastructure to meet increasingly stringent state and federal safe drinking water laws and regulations governing fire flow standards for public fire protection.

(b) Increasing amounts of capital are required to finance the necessary investment in public water system infrastructure.

(c) Scale economies are achievable in the operation of public water systems.

(d) Providing water corporations with an incentive to achieve these scale economies will provide benefits to ratepayers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

2720.

(a) The commission shall use the standard of fair market value when establishing the rate base value for the distribution system of a public water system acquired by a water corporation. This standard shall be used for ratesetting.

(1) For purposes of this section, “public water system” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) For purposes of this section, “fair
 market value” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Section 1263.320 of the Code of Civil Procedure.

(b) If the fair market value exceeds reproduction cost, as determined in accordance with Section 820 of the Evidence Code, the commission may include the difference in the rate base for ratesetting purposes if it finds that the additional amounts are fair and reasonable. In determining whether the additional amounts are fair and reasonable the commission shall consider whether the acquisition of the public water system will improve water system reliability, whether the ability of the water system to comply with health and safety regulations is improved, whether the water corporation by acquiring the public water system can achieve efficiencies and economies of scale that would not otherwise be available, and whether the effect on existing customers of the water corporation and the acquired public water system is fair and reasonable.

(c) The provisions of subdivisions (a) and (b) shall also be applicable to the acquisition of a sewer system by any sewer system corporation or water corporation.

(d) Consistent with the provisions of this section, the commission shall retain all powers and responsibilities granted pursuant to Sections 851 and 852.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 675, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2.7. Consolidation for Safe Drinking Water Act of 2021 [2721. - 2722.]

2721.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Consolidate” means to join two or more small community water systems, state small water systems, or affected residences not served by a small community water system
 or state small water system into a single consolidated water system.

(2) “Small community water system” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) “State small water system” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) (1) A water or sewer system corporation may file an application and obtain approval from the commission through an order authorizing that water or sewer system corporation to consolidate with a small community water system or state small water system identified as failing or at risk of failing by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(2) The commission shall approve or deny an application filed pursuant to paragraph (1) within
 12 months of its filing, unless the commission makes a written determination that the deadline cannot be met, including findings as to the reason, and issues an order extending the deadline by up to four months. The commission may grant additional extensions of four months or less consistent with this paragraph.

(3) A water or sewer system corporation shall submit a fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) when filing an application for authority to complete a consolidation made pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) All moneys collected pursuant to paragraph (3) shall be deposited into the Consolidation For Safe Drinking Water Fund, established pursuant to Section 2722.

(c) (1) (A) For a consolidation valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, a water or sewer system corporation may file an advice letter and obtain approval from the commission through a resolution authorizing that water or sewer system corporation to consolidate with a
 small community water system or state small water system identified as failing or at risk of failing by the State Water Resources Control Board.

(B) If an advice letter filed pursuant to this paragraph is uncontested, approval may be given by the executive director or the director of the division of the commission having regulatory jurisdiction over the water or sewer system corporation.

(C) Absent incomplete documentation, the commission shall approve or deny the advice letter within
 180 days of its filing by the applicant water or sewer system corporation, if the advice letter is not contested, unless the executive director makes a written determination that the deadline cannot be met, including findings as to the reason, and issues a response extending the deadline by up to 60 days. The executive director may grant additional extensions of 60 days or less consistent with this subparagraph.

(2) For a consolidation valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, the commission may designate a different procedure if it determines that the consolidation warrants a more comprehensive review than the
 advice letter procedure described in paragraph (1) provides.

(d) For purposes of a consolidation pursuant to either subdivision (b) or (c), the commission shall prioritize cases in which a water or sewer system corporation consolidates with a small community water system or state small water system that is subject to a citation issued pursuant to Section 116650 of the Health and Safety Code or a compliance order issued pursuant to Section 116655 of the Health and Safety Code for failure to meet primary or secondary drinking water standards, as defined in Section 116275 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) A water or sewer system corporation seeking to consolidate with a small community water system or state small water system pursuant to this section shall give adequate public notice and provide adequate opportunities for public participation, as determined by the commission.

(f) This section does not require a small community water system or state small water system that is not subject to the jurisdiction, control, and regulation of the commission to obtain authorization from the commission
 before consolidating with a small community water system or state small water system.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 713, Sec. 2.   (AB 1250)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

2722.

The Consolidation For Safe Drinking Water Fund is hereby created. All moneys in the fund are available, upon appropriation by the Legislature, to the commission and shall be used only for the purpose of processing applications pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 2721 along with any other associated regulatory costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 713, Sec. 2.   (AB 1250)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Private and Mutual Water Service Law [2725. - 2729.]

2725.

As used in this chapter, “mutual water company” means any private corporation or association organized for the purposes of delivering water to its stockholders and members at cost, including use of works for conserving, treating and reclaiming water.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 200.)
-------------------------------------------

2726.

As used in this chapter, “private irrigation plant” means a water system which is not operated by a mutual water company or by a public utility as defined in Part 1 (commencing with Section 201) or in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 2701).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 169.)
-------------------------------------------

2727.

In order to increase the output of agricultural products in this State during the time the United States is a party to war or to a state of war, the owner of any private irrigation plant may deliver water to others, or any mutual water company may deliver water to others than its stockholders or members, with or without compensation, without becoming a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

2728.

The delivery of water pursuant to Section 2727 is subject to the following restrictions:

(a) Until a mutual water company fills the water orders of its stockholders or members pursuant to its constitution, bylaws, or rules, it shall not deliver water to others.

(b) The temporary service authorized by Section 2727 shall not continue for more than six months after the war need has ceased.

(c) Before any temporary service of water is made a statement shall be filed with the commission
 stating the private irrigation plant or mutual water company rendering the service, the party receiving it, the land irrigated, and the rate, if any, charged for the service.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 72.)
-------------------------------------------

2729.

A mutual water company may exercise the power of eminent domain for water, water rights, canals, ditches, dams, poundings, flumes, aqueducts, and pipes for irrigation of lands furnished with water by such company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4.5. Electrical and Gas Corporations [2771. - 2775.7.]

2771.

The commission shall establish priorities among the types or categories of customers of every electrical corporation and every gas corporation, and among the uses of electricity or gas by such customers. The commission shall determine which of such customers and uses provide the most important public benefits and serve the greatest public need and shall categorize all other customers and uses in order of descending priority based upon these standards. The commission shall establish no such priority after the effective date of this chapter which would cause any reduction in the transmission of gas to California pursuant to any federal rule, order, or
 regulation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 757.)
-------------------------------------------

2772.

In establishing the priorities pursuant to Section 2771, the commission shall include, but not be limited to, a consideration of all the following:

(a) A determination of the customers and uses of electricity and gas, in descending order of priority, that provide the most important public benefits and serve the greatest public need.

(b) A determination of the customers and uses of electricity and gas that are not included under
 subdivision (a).

(c) A determination of the economic, social, and other effects of a temporary discontinuance in electrical or gas service to the customers or for the uses determined in accordance with subdivision (a) or (b).

(d) A determination of the potential effect of extreme temperatures on the health and safety of residential customers. In making this determination, the commission shall do all of the following:

(1) Consult with appropriate medical experts and review appropriate literature and research.

(2) Consider whether providing priority to customers experiencing extreme temperatures would result in increased outage frequency and duration for remaining customers and its effect on the health and safety of those remaining customers.

(3) To the extent the commission determines it is in the public interest to provide priority to customers that experience extreme temperatures, it shall provide that priority only when temperatures are extreme.

(4) Consider whether alternative measures are appropriate, including, but not limited to, reducing the duration of the outage or imposing the outage earlier or later in the day.

(e) A determination of unacceptable jeopardy or imminent danger to public health and safety that creates substantial likelihood of severe health risk requiring medical attention.

(f) Any curtailment or allocation rules, orders, or regulations issued by any agency of the federal government.

(g) The commission
 shall also consider the effect of providing a high priority to some customers on those customers who do not receive a high priority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 447, Sec. 1.   Effective October 3, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.

The commission may establish as many priorities of use for a customer as that customer has uses of gas or electricity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 757.)
-------------------------------------------

2773.5.

Notwithstanding any rule, order, or decision of the commission to the contrary, industrial or commercial gas customers shall not be required to maintain any alternative fuel capability with respect to equipment which uses gas to generate steam for enhanced crude oil recovery or which uses gas for purposes of cogeneration. Nothing in this section shall require the commission to assign these industrial customers any higher gas priority as a result of the elimination of this alternative fuel requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 534, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.

In the event any electrical or gas corporation experiences any shortage of capacity or capability in the generation, production, or transmission of electricity or gas and is unable to obtain electricity or gas from any other source so that the corporation is unable to meet all demands by its customers, the commission shall, to the extent practicable, order that service be temporarily reduced by an amount that reflects the priorities established pursuant to this chapter, for the duration of the shortage. The commission may, to the extent permitted by federal law or regulation, require electrical or gas corporations to mutually assist each other in dealing with shortages
 resulting from inadequate fuel supplies, and shall determine the terms, including compensation, under which such assistance shall be provided.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 757.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.1.

(a) (1) The commission shall require an electrical corporation to include in an annual reliability report, required pursuant to Decision 96-09-045, as amended, or a decision that supersedes Decision 96-09-045, information on the reliability of service to end use customers that identifies, but is not limited to, the frequency and duration of interruptions in services. This information shall indicate areas with both the most frequent and longest
 outages, using local areas determined by the commission. The commission, in consultation with the electrical corporation, shall ensure that the geographical boundaries of local areas do not split up circuits for reporting purposes, if the electrical corporation aggregates data by circuits. The information shall be sufficiently aggregated to both maintain electrical system security, and be of use and relevance to affected customers of the electrical corporation.

(2) Before July 1, 2014, the commission shall determine the local areas for the purposes of paragraph (1).

(3) The requirements of paragraph (1) shall apply to annual reports due after July 1, 2014.

(4) The electrical corporation shall conspicuously post on its Internet Web site the annual report required pursuant to Decision 96-09-045, as amended, or a
 decision that supersedes Decision 96-09-045.

(b) (1) The commission shall use the information contained in an electrical corporation’s annual reliability report to require cost-effective remediation of reliability deficiencies if the report, or more than one report, identifies repeated deficiencies in the same local area as determined by the commission pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a). In requiring cost-effective remediation, the commission shall consult with the electrical corporation and consider mitigating factors that may impede an electrical corporation from implementing required cost-effective remediation, including, but not limited to, local permitting matters or other events or conditions or public policy considerations that may present higher priority safety or reliability issues.

(2) The commission may suspend the requirements of
 paragraph (1) if the commission finds that expenditures by the electrical corporation to comply with that paragraph are not justified or that the remediation measures undertaken by the electrical corporation are not effective at improving reliability.

(c) (1) The commission may order an electrical corporation to make more frequent trend analyses of local area service reliability and to make those analyses publicly available.

 (2) The information made publicly available shall provide sufficient confidentiality for purposes of protecting electrical system security.

(3) The commission may make those analyses publicly available.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   (AB 66)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.5.

An electrical corporation or local publicly owned electric utility shall immediately notify the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, the Office of Emergency Services, and the sheriff and any affected chief of police of the specific area within their respective law enforcement jurisdictions that will sustain a planned loss of power as soon as the planned loss becomes known as to when and where that power loss will
 occur. The notification shall include common geographical boundaries, grid or block numbers of the affected area, and the next anticipated power loss area designated by the electrical corporation or public entity during rotating blackouts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 495.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------

2774.6.

The commission, in consultation with the Energy Commission, shall develop a program for residential and commercial customer air-conditioning load control, as an element of each electrical corporation’s tariffed service offerings paid for with electrical service rates. The goal of the program shall be to contribute to the adequacy of electricity supply and to help customers reduce their electrical service bills in a cost-effective manner. The program may include peak load reduction programs for residential and commercial air-conditioning systems, if the commission determines that the inclusion would be cost effective.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 396, Sec. 35.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

2775.

No electrical or gas corporation which reduces or discontinues service in accordance with any order of the commission issued pursuant to this chapter shall be liable for any damages to any person or property resulting from such reduction or discontinuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1976, Ch. 757.)
-------------------------------------------

2775.5.

(a) If an electrical or gas corporation desires to manufacture, lease, sell, or otherwise own or control any solar energy system, it shall submit to the commission, in such form as the commission may specify, a description of the proposed program of solar energy development which it desires to pursue. The corporation may pursue the program of solar energy development unless the commission, within 45 days after the commission has accepted the filing of the corporation’s description pursuant to this subdivision, orders the corporation to obtain from the commission the authorization to do so as provided in this section. In cases where
 the corporation seeks to pursue a program of solar energy development with costs and expenses to be passed through to the ratepayers, the corporation may not implement the program until it receives an authorization from the commission which includes findings and a determination, pursuant to subdivision (f), that the program is in the ratepayers’ interest. No such authorization shall be required for any solar energy system which is owned or controlled for experimental or demonstration purposes. As used in this subdivision, “experimental or demonstration purposes” means a limited program of installation, use, or development the sole purpose of which is to investigate the technical viability or economic cost effectiveness of a solar application.

(b) The commission shall deny the authorization sought if it finds that the proposed program will restrict competition or restrict growth in the solar energy industry or unfairly employ in a manner which
 would restrict competition in the market for solar energy systems any financial, marketing, distributing, or generating advantage which the corporation may exercise as a result of its authority to operate as a public utility. Before granting any such authorization, the commission shall find that the program of solar energy development proposed by the corporation will accelerate the development and use of solar energy systems in this state for the duration of the program.

(c) The commission shall suspend or terminate any authorization granted pursuant to this section whenever it finds and determines that the program of solar energy development no longer qualifies for the authorization under subdivision (b). This subdivision applies to all programs of solar energy development undertaken by a gas or electrical corporation pursuant to this section, including programs undertaken pursuant to subdivision (a) without formal authorization of the
 commission.

(d) As used in this section, “solar energy system” means equipment which uses solar energy to heat or cool or produce electricity and which has a useful life of at least three years. “Solar energy system” does not include an electric plant as defined by Section 217.

(e) The commission shall prescribe the form of the description required by subdivision (a) by July 1, 1990. The description of the solar energy program filed with the commission shall include, but not be limited to, a showing that the program will not restrict competition, or restrict growth in the solar energy industry, or unfairly employ any financial, marketing, distributing, or generation advantage by the corporation on behalf of the solar energy program.

(f) The costs and expenses of implementing a program of solar energy development
 proposed pursuant to this section shall not be passed through to the ratepayers of an electrical or gas corporation unless the commission finds and determines that it is in the ratepayers’ interest to do so.

(g) An electrical or gas corporation shall file a written notice with the commission in all cases where one of its subsidiaries seeks to implement a solar energy development program. If an affiliate of an electrical or gas corporation seeks to implement a solar energy development program, the electrical or gas corporation shall notify the commission of its affiliate’s actions annually, in a form prescribed by the commission. If the electrical or gas corporation intends to provide financial, marketing, or distribution assistance to any subsidiary or affiliate thereof in implementing the subsidiary’s or affiliate’s program of solar energy development, the electrical or gas corporation shall obtain authorization from the commission to provide
 that assistance. Authorization by the commission shall be given in the manner provided in subdivisions (a) and (b), and suspension or termination by the commission may be imposed in the manner provided in subdivision (c).

(h) The commission shall provide public notice of the receipt of any corporation filings submitted pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 339, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2775.6.

Every request for the recovery in rates of any costs or liability incurred by a gas corporation and resulting from any violation of Section 25421 of the Health and Safety Code, or of any costs, damages, penalties, or other liabilities incurred in connection with the sale of landfill gas containing chemicals known to the state to cause cancer or reproductive toxicity shall be reviewed by the commission for the purposes of
 establishing rates for the gas corporation. If the commission finds that the gas corporation, on or after January 1, 1989, knowingly and intentionally violated Section 25421 of the Health and Safety Code, the costs and liability shall be disallowed by the commission for purposes of determining rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 162, Sec. 160.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

2775.7.

(a) (1) If the commission determines that a moratorium on new natural gas service connections is necessary to prevent substantial and imminent harm or to ensure gas system reliability, the commission shall state the necessity for the action in a report provided to all of the following entities:

(A) The Assembly Committee on Utilities and Energy.

(B) The Senate Committee on Energy, Utilities and Communications.

(C) All affected gas corporations.

(2) The commission shall include in the report to the policy committees of the
 Legislature specified in paragraph (1) factual findings supporting the need to propose a moratorium on new natural gas service connections. The report shall include, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(A) The number of pending gas service connection applications with each affected gas corporation.

(B) The estimated gas load deferred under the proposed moratorium.

(C) The system constraints that led to the proposed moratorium.

(D) Alternative actions considered to address the proposed need for a moratorium, including increasing or restoring natural gas transmission and storage infrastructure, and the reason those actions were not taken or were insufficient.

(E) The process for a
 customer to request an exemption from the moratorium.

(b) When a gas corporation receives notification from the commission that an action is pending to suspend new gas service connections, the gas corporation shall immediately notify any known potential or current customers that may experience a service impact as a result of the proposed suspension.

(c) The commission shall, at the yearly informational hearings pursuant to Section 321.6, present to the Assembly Committee on Utilities and Energy and the Senate Committee on Energy, Utilities and Communications the status of natural gas service connections and efforts to provide natural gas supply.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 481, Sec. 1.   (AB 1879)   Effective September 18, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Electrical Cooperatives [2776. - 2778.]

2776.

As used in this chapter, the term “electrical cooperative” means any private corporation or association organized for the purposes of transmitting or distributing electricity exclusively to its stockholders or members at cost.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2781 (as added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 451) by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

2777.

The commission shall have no authority to establish rates or regulate the borrowing of money, the issuance of evidences of indebtedness, or the sale, lease, assignment, mortgage, or other disposal or encumbrance of the property of any electrical cooperative.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 2782 (as added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 451) by Stats. 1977, Ch. 579.)
-------------------------------------------

2778.

Except as otherwise specified in this chapter, every electrical cooperative is subject to Part 1 (commencing with Section 201).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 144, Sec. 170.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5.5. Electric Microutilities [2780. - 2780.1.]

2780.

As used in this chapter, the term “electric microutility” means any electrical corporation that is regulated by the commission and organized for the purpose of providing sole-source generation, distribution, and sale of electricity exclusively to a customer base of fewer than 2,000 customers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

2780.1.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the commission consider the legal, administrative, and operational costs that an electric microutility faces if it is named as a respondent in a hearing generally applicable to electrical corporations. The limited resources of a microutility are disproportionately strained by the cost of response.

(b) Further, it is the intent of the Legislature that the commission consider the costs described in subdivision (a) before naming an
 electric microutility as a respondent in a hearing generally applicable to electrical corporations.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 639, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Home Insulation Assistance and Financing [2781. - 2790.]

2781.

As used in this chapter, the term “electrical corporation” shall have the same meaning as prescribed in Section 218, and the term “gas corporation” shall have the same meaning as prescribed in Section 222.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1202.)
-------------------------------------------

2782.

The commission shall permit any electrical or gas corporation to institute a home insulation assistance and financing program for its residential customers in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. The commission shall develop and adopt, by regulation or order, such requirements as it finds are necessary or desirable to implement the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1202.)
-------------------------------------------

2783.

A home insulation assistance and financing program shall meet the requirements specified in Sections 2784 to 2786, inclusive, and such other requirements as the commission may impose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1202.)
-------------------------------------------

2784.
